src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/pt.aff
SFX K   r              m              dizer
SFX K   er             ia             dizer
SFX K   er             ias            dizer
SFX K   er              amos          dizer
SFX K   er              eis           dizer
SFX K   er             iam            dizer
SFX K   zer            sse            dizer
SFX K   zer            sseste         dizer
SFX K   zer            sse            dizer
SFX K   zer            ssemos         dizer
SFX K   zer            ssestes        dizer
SFX K   zer            sseram         dizer
SFX K   zer            ssera          dizer
SFX K   zer            sseras         dizer
SFX K   zer            ss ramos       dizer
SFX K   zer            ss reis        dizer
SFX K   zer            rei            dizer
SFX K   zer            r s            dizer
SFX K   zer            r              dizer
SFX K   zer            remos          dizer
SFX K   zer            reis           dizer
SFX K   zer            r o            dizer
SFX K   zer            ga             dizer
SFX K   zer            gas            dizer
SFX K   zer            gamos          dizer
SFX K   zer            gais           dizer
SFX K   zer            gam            dizer
SFX K   zer            ssesse         dizer
SFX K   zer            ssesses        dizer
SFX K   zer            ss ssemos      dizer
SFX K   zer            ss sseis       dizer
SFX K   zer            ssessem        dizer
SFX K   zer            sser           dizer
SFX K   zer            sseres         dizer
SFX K   zer            sser           dizer
SFX K   zer            ssermos        dizer
SFX K   zer            sserdes        dizer
SFX K   zer            sserem         dizer
SFX K   zer            ria            dizer
SFX K   zer            rias           dizer
SFX K   zer            r amos         dizer
SFX K   zer            r eis          dizer
SFX K   zer            riam           dizer
SFX K   r              i              dizer
SFX K   r              ndo            dizer
SFX K   zer            to             dizer
SFX K   zer            ta             dizer
SFX K   zer            tos            dizer
SFX K   zer            tas            dizer
SFX K   0              es             dizer
SFX K   0              mos            dizer
SFX K   0              des            dizer
SFX K   0              em             dizer
SFX K   ar                            ar
SFX K   er                            er

SFX B Y 2
SFX B   r              damente        [ia]r
SFX B   er             idamente       er

SFX o Y 4
SFX o   r              dela           [ai]r
SFX o   r              delas          [ai]r
SFX o   er             idela          er
SFX o   er             idelas         er

SFX y Y 4
SFX y   o              eiro           o
SFX y   o              eiros          o
SFX y   a              eira           a
SFX y   a              eiras          a

SFX w Y 20
SFX w   0              so             o
SFX w   0              sa             o
SFX w   0              sos            o
SFX w   0              sas            o
SFX w   a              oso            a
SFX w   a              osa            a
SFX w   a              osos           a
SFX w   a              osas           a
SFX w     o            cioso            o
SFX w     o            ciosa            o
SFX w     o            ciosos           o
SFX w     o            ciosas           o
SFX w   e              oso            e
SFX w   e              osa            e
SFX w   e              osos           e
SFX w   e              osas           e
SFX w   0              oso            [^aeiou]
SFX w   0              osa            [^aeiou]
SFX w   0              osos           [^aeiou]
SFX w   0              osas           [^aeiou]

SFX j Y 25
SFX j   0              izar           l
SFX j   e              izar           e
SFX j   o              izar           o
SFX j   a              zar            ia
SFX j   a              izar           [^i]a
SFX j   0              izado          l
SFX j   e              izado          e
SFX j   o              izado          o
SFX j   a              zado           ia
SFX j   a              izado          [^i]a
SFX j   0              izada          l
SFX j   e              izada          e
SFX j   o              izada          o
SFX j   a              zada           ia
SFX j   a              izada          [^i]a
SFX j   0              izados         l
SFX j   e              izados         e
SFX j   o              izados         o
SFX j   a              zados          ia
SFX j   a              izados         [^i]a
SFX j   0              izadas         l
SFX j   e              izadas         e
SFX j   o              izadas         o
SFX j   a              zadas          ia
SFX j   a              izados         [^i]a

SFX G Y 29
SFX G   o              ice            [^ gc]o
SFX G    o             cice            o
SFX G   go             guice          go
SFX G   co             quice          co
SFX G   a              ice            [^ gc]a
SFX G    a             cice            a
SFX G   ga             guice          ga
SFX G   ca             quice          ca
SFX G   e              ice            e
SFX G   0              ice            r
SFX G   0              ice            [^v][^q]l
SFX G   vel            bilice         [^  ]vel
SFX G    vel           abilice         vel
SFX G    vel           ibilice         vel
SFX G   z              cice           z
SFX G   o              ices           [^ gc]o
SFX G    o             cices           o
SFX G   go             guices         go
SFX G   co             quices         co
SFX G   a              ices           [^ gc]a
SFX G    a             cices           a
SFX G   ga             guices         ga
SFX G   ca             quices         ca
SFX G   0              ices           [^v][^q]l
SFX G   e              ices           e
SFX G   0              ices           r
SFX G   vel            bilices        [^  ]vel
SFX G    vel           abilices        vel
SFX G    vel           ibilices        vel

SFX J Y 7
SFX J   r              cionismo       [ai]r
SFX J   er             icionismo      er
SFX J   ar              metro         ar
SFX J   ar              dromo         ar
SFX J   a               dromo         a
SFX J   o               dromo         o
SFX J   e               dromo         e
REP 24
REP por pro
REP pre per
REP damente mente
REP mente damente
REP iz  z
REP cao   o
REP   ss
REP ss  
REP c ss
REP ss c
REP ch x
REP x ch
REP c  x
REP x c 
REP k qu
REP  ti it 
REP it   ti
REP iss   ssi
REP il   li
REP  li il 
REP  fi if 
REP if   fi
REP nume mune
REP coen quen

MAP 11
MAP a 
MAP a 
MAP a 
MAP e 
MAP e 
MAP i 
MAP c 
MAP o 
MAP o 
MAP o 
MAP u 
