src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/pt.dic
abnegar/XYBcD
acalorar/XYB
aceitar/XYcMDnvB
acentuar/XYSBc
adequar/YcdBvS
admirar/XYcDB
afectar/XYScnBR
afincar/XYMB
afortunar/XYB
agradecer/XYRMvB
alarve/G
alcoviteiro/fpG
alentar/XYB
amar/XYDnB
amparar/XYSMDB
angustiar/XYDnB
animar/XYcDnvB
apaixonar/XYnSvB
apertar/XYSMDB
apressar/XYDB
arrebatar/XYMDnB
arrepender/XYMB
arriscar/XYB
arrojar/XYMDB
articular/mpXYcnvDBS
aselha/pG
asno/pG
assumir/XYRB
atabalhoar/XYBcM
baboso/fpG
bacoco/pfG
balofo/pfG
banana/ptG
bandalho/pfG
basbaque/Gp
beata/Gp
besta/pG
bichano/pfG
bizantino/pfiG
bizarro/fpG
bodega/pG
borracho/pG
borrego/pG
brasileiro/pfiG
brejeiro/pfG
cachopo/fpG
caduco/fpdG
caloiro/pfG
camelo/pfGp
canalha/ipG
candonga/pG
carambola/pG
casmurro/pfG
chafurdo/fG
charme/pw
chocalho/Gp
chocho/pfG
choco/fpG
chulo/tipG
comprovar/XYcDnBv
confiar/XYSBv
continuar/XYScDB
controlar/XYSDvB
crian a/pGh
demorar/XYB
desajeitar/XYB
descansar/XYB
descompadrar/XYB
desconjuntar/XYB
descuidar/XYB
desenvolver/XYMnuB
desesperar/XYcBDn
desleixar/XYB
desmazelar/XYB
destacar/XYMvB
devotar/XYcMB
disfar ar/XYB
doido/pfG
empenhar/XYMDvB
endiabrar/XYB
equilibrar/XYScDnRB
errar/XYnB
esfor ar/XYDB
especular/XYBcD
esquisito/fpG
estouvado/pfG
exagerar/XYcBD
fatigar/XYDnB
fidalgo/pfhG
fingir/XYMDB
fundamentar/XYcnB
gabarola/pG
gago/pfG
garantir/XYDB
garoto/fpG
generalizar/XYcDvB
imundo/fpmG
inspirar/XYcDvB
insubordinar/XYcDvB
interessar/XYSnB
justificar/XYcDIBn
lamentar/XYcDB
limitar/XYcnvDB
louco/fpmG
macaco/fphG
malandro/pfG
maluco/pfG
matreiro/pG
meigo/pGf
merecer/XYSMDB
mesquinho/fGpm
mimalho/pfG
moderar/XYcDnvB
modular/pDXYBdcnD
nojo/G
nutrir/XYcMDvuJ
obstinar/XYBc
ousar/XYB
palerma/pG
parolo/fpG
pedante/piG
pedincha/pG
pelintra/piG
perpetuar/XYcBD
piolho/pG
prolongar/XYcMvB
pulha/pG
reconhecer/XYMDvB
sagrar/XYcDB
sebento/G
sentir/YMPB
separar/XYcDvB
sincronizar/XYBcS
sino/py
sonso/fpG
sorna/G
sossegar/XYDB
sovina/G
subordinar/XYcDnvB
suportar/XYcvB
tacanho/Gpf
temperar/XYSMDnvB
tolerar/XYnvdB
tonto/fpmG
traquina/pG
vincar/XYB
virtual/pmdj
